Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-904
Grain dealer; receipt, contract, bill of lading, other written communication requirements.

Each grain dealer or his or her agent upon taking possession of grain from a seller shall issue a receipt, contract, bill of lading, or other written communication to the seller or his or her agent. The grain dealer receipt, contract, bill of lading, or other written communication issued by the grain dealer shall be in such form as the Public Service Commission may by rule and regulation require.

Laws 1985, LB 389, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB183, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB894, § 4.
July 18, 2026
A buyer's failure to give the seller a proper receipt as required by this section does not render null and void the time requirements of section 75-905 to preserve a claim against the buyer's security pursuant to section 75-906. Fecht v. The Bunnell Co., 243 Neb. 1, 497 N.W.2d 50 (1993).